Utah statutes.
10-8-46.   Plumbing -- Regulation of construction and repair -- Board of examiners.

They may regulate the construction, repair and use of vaults, cisterns, areas, hydrants, pumps, sewers, gutters and plumbing, and provide for a board of examiners to examine into the fitness and qualifications of persons following the plumbing trade, and may prescribe what qualifications are necessary for persons following said trade.

